Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
Article 5 Legislative Department
[§ 39.] State expenses — Limitation — Exceptions.

§ 3.

Excepting monies raised or collected for educational purposes, highway purposes, to pay Confederate pensions and the just debts of the State, the General Assembly is hereby prohibited from appropriating or expending more than the sum of Two and One-Half Million Dollars for all purposes, for any fiscal year; provided the limit herein fixed may be exceeded by the votes of three-fourths of the members elected to each House of the General Assembly. [As added to Art. 5 by Const. Amend. 19; as amended by Const. Amend. 86.]

Publisher's Notes.

As added by Ark. Const. Amend. 19, § 5 [§ 41] contained a second paragraph which read: “The provisions of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas in conflict with this Amendment are hereby repealed in so far as they are in conflict herewith, and this Amendment shall be self-executing and shall take and have full effect immediately upon its adoption by the electors of the State.”

Ark. Const. Amend. 86, which amended this section effective January 1, 2009, was proposed by H.J.R. 1004 during the 2007 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2008 general election by a vote of 664,671 for and 292,436 against. The amendment substituted “fiscal year” for “biennial period”.

[§ 40.] General appropriation bill — Enactment.

§ 4.

In making appropriations for any fiscal year, the General Assembly shall first pass the General Appropriation Bill provided for in Section 30 of Article 5 of the Constitution, and no other appropriation bill may be enacted before that shall have been done. [As added to Art. 5 by Const. Amend. 19; as amended by Const. Amend. 86.]

Publisher's Notes.

As added by Ark. Const. Amend. 19, § 5 [§ 41] contained a second paragraph which read: “The provisions of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas in conflict with this Amendment are hereby repealed in so far as they are in conflict herewith, and this Amendment shall be self-executing and shall take and have full effect immediately upon its adoption by the electors of the State.”

Ark. Const. Amend. 86, which amended this section effective January 1, 2009, was proposed by H.J.R. 1004 during the 2007 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2008 general election by a vote of 664,671 for and 292,436 against. The amendment substituted “fiscal year” for “biennial period”.

[§ 41.] Expenses incurred or authorized only by bill — Repealing clause.

§ 5.

No expense shall be incurred or authorized for either House except by a bill duly passed by both Houses and approved by the Governor. [As added to Art. 5 by Const. Amend. 19.]

Publisher's Notes.

As added by Ark. Const. Amend. 19, § 5 [§ 41] contained a second paragraph which read: “The provisions of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas in conflict with this Amendment are hereby repealed in so far as they are in conflict herewith, and this Amendment shall be self-executing and shall take and have full effect immediately upon its adoption by the electors of the State.”

§ 42. Review and approval of administrative rules.

The General Assembly may provide by law:

For the review by a legislative committee of administrative rules promulgated by a state agency before the administrative rules become effective; and

That administrative rules promulgated by a state agency shall not become effective until reviewed and approved by the legislative committee charged by law with the review of administrative rules under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

The review and approval by a legislative committee under subsection (a) of this section may occur during the interim or during a regular, special, or fiscal session of the General Assembly. [As added by Const. Amend. 92.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, No. 1258, § 1, provided: “LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

Amendment 92 to the Arkansas Constitution states in part: ‘The General Assembly may provide by law for the review by a legislative committee of administrative rules promulgated by a state agency before the administrative rules become effective; and that administrative rules promulgated by a state agency shall not become effective until reviewed and approved by the legislative committee charged by law with the review of administrative rules under subdivision (a)(1) of this section’;

“(2)

As Amendment 92 does not define the term ‘state agency’, the General Assembly may establish a definition by law as part of its implementation of Amendment 92;

“(3)

The General Assembly at this time wishes to exclude the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, and institutions of higher education from the definition of ‘state agency’ applied to the implementation of Amendment 92; and

“(4)

The General Assembly or the Legislative Council reserve the right to amend the definition of ‘state agency’ in the future to include one (1) or all of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, and institutions of higher education.”

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 92, which added this section, was proposed by S.J.R. 7 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 469,431 for and 325,396 against. The amendment was effective thirty days after the election pursuant to § 7-9-119.